Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Chapter 15. Conveyances.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to recording of conveyances, see AS 40.17. For rules for construing real estate descriptions, see AS

09.25.040

.

Collateral references. —

1 Am. Jur. 2d, Acknowledgments, § 1 et seq.

20 Am. Jur. 2d, Cotenancy and Joint Ownership, § 1 et seq.

23 Am. Jur. 2d, Deeds, § 1 et seq.

28 Am. Jur. 2d, Estates, § 1 et seq.

54A Am. Jur. 2d, Mortgages, § 1 et seq.

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Property, § 1 et seq.

2 C.J.S., Adverse Possession, §§ 90-121.

21 C.J.S., Covenants, §§ 14-15.

264 C.J.S., Deeds, §§ 1-7.

31 C.J.S., Estates, §§ 11, 12.

92 C.J.S., Vendor and Purchaser, § 1 et seq.

Rule denying recovery of property to one who conveyed to defraud creditors as applicable where the claim which motivated the conveyance was never established.
6 ALR4th 862.

Estate created by deed to persons described as husband and wife but not legally married.
9 ALR4th 1189.

Which of conflicting descriptions in deeds or mortgages of fractional quantity of interest intended to be conveyed prevails.
12 ALR4th 795.